New Jersey, session 221, A104.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The director may, subject to rules and regulations, issue to the holder of a limited brewery license, restricted brewery license, craft distillery license, plenary winery license, farm winery license, or cidery and meadery license, as established pursuant to R.S.33:1-10, a daily or annual permit to sell any of the licensees products at a seasonal farm market for consumption off the premises of the seasonal farm market. The director shall issue a separate permit for each seasonal farm market at which the licensees products are intended to be sold. The director shall not issue a permit pursuant to this section for use in connection with a roadside farm stand. b.    Subject to rules and regulations, a licensee issued a permit pursuant to this section may: (1)   transport the licensees products for the purpose of selling them at a seasonal farm market; and (2)   offer samples for sampling purposes to persons of the legal age to consume alcoholic beverages in the amounts authorized pursuant to R.S.33:1-10 during each day the seasonal farm market is operating. c.     A daily permit shall be valid for the hours a seasonal farm market is open during the 24-hour period for which the daily permit is issued.  An annual permit shall be valid for one year from the date of issuance.  The director may renew a permit provided the permit holder continues to hold a limited brewery license, restricted brewery license, craft distillery license, plenary winery license, farm winery license, or cidery and meadery license, as applicable. d.    The director may establish a fee not to exceed $25 for a daily permit and not to exceed $75 for an annual permit for the issuance and renewal of a permit under this section. e.     As used in this section, roadside farm stand means a location owned by a single farmer or producer at which the farmer or producer sells agricultural products only from the farmers or producers farm directly to consumers. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month next following the date of enactment.